test/src/gt-desc-yamls/sme-tests_gt-desc.yaml
  Verb - boahtit: # BOAHTI_IV
    boahtit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: boađán
    boahtit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: boahtá
    boahtit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: bohtet
    boahtit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: bođiiga
    boahtit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: bođiidet
    boahtit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: bohte
    boahtit+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: boađe
    boahtit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: bohtoset
    boahtit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [boađáleimme, boađášeimme]
    boahtit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [boađálii, boađášii]
    boahtit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [bođeš, bođeža]
    boahtit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: bođežit
    boahtit+V+IV+Ger: [boađidin, boađidiin, boađidettiin]
    boahtit+V+IV+PrfPrc: boahtán
    boahtit+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: bohttojuvvot
    boahtit+V+IV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: bohttui
    boahtit+V+IV+Der/goahti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: boahtigohten
    boahtit+V+IV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [boađestalaiga, boađástalaiga]
    boahtit+V+IV+Der/h+V+Der/easti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: boađiheasttát
    boahtit+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: boahtimis

  Verb - beassat: # DIEVVA_IV
    beassat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: beasan
    beassat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: beassá
    beassat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: besset
    beassat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: beasaiga
    beassat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: beasaidet
    beassat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: besse
    beassat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: beasa
    beassat+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: bessoset
    beassat+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [beasaleimme, beasašeimme]
    beassat+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [beasalii, beasašii]
    beassat+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [beasaš, beasaža]
    beassat+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: beasažit
    beassat+V+IV+Ger: [beasadin, beasadiin, beasadettiin]
    beassat+V+IV+PrfPrc: beassan
    beassat+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: bessojuvvot
    beassat+V+IV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: bessui
    beassat+V+IV+Der/goahti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: beassagohten
    beassat+V+IV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: beasastalaiga
    beassat+V+IV+Der/h+V+Der/easti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: beasaheasttát
    beassat+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: beassamis

  Verb - ahccohallat: # RAIMMAHALLA_IV
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ahccohalan
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ahccohallá
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ahccohallet
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: ahccohalaiga
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ahccohalaidet
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ahccohalle
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: ahccohala
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: ahccohalloset
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [ahccohalaleimme, ahccohalašeimme]
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [ahccohalalii, ahccohalašii]
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [ahccohalaš, ahccohalaža]
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: ahccohalažit
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Ger: [ahccohaladin, ahccohaladiin, ahccohaladettiin]
    ahccohallat+V+IV+PrfPrc: ahccohallan
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Der/goahti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ahccohallagohten
    ahccohallat+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: ahccohallamis

  Verb - rostet: # GILLE_IV
    rostet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rosten
    rostet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: roste
    rostet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: rostejit
    rostet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: rostiiga
    rostet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: rostiidet
    rostet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [rosteje, rostejedje]
    rostet+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: roste
    rostet+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: rostejehkoset
    rostet+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [rosteleimme, rostešeimme]
    rostet+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [rostelii, rostešii]
    rostet+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [rosteš, rosteža]
    rostet+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: rostežit
    rostet+V+IV+Ger: [rostedin, rostediin, rostedettiin]
    rostet+V+IV+PrfPrc: rosten
    rostet+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: rostejuvvot
    rostet+V+IV+Der/goahti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: rostegohten
    rostet+V+IV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: rostestalaiga
    rostet+V+IV+Der/h+V+Der/easti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: rosteheasttát
    rostet+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: rostemis

  Verb - hoitát: # DOHPPE_TV
    hoitát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hoitán
    hoitát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hoitá
    hoitát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: hoitájit
    hoitát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: hoitáiga
    hoitát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: hoitáidet
    hoitát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [hoitáje, hoitájedje]
    hoitát+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: hoitá
    hoitát+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: hoitájehkoset
    hoitát+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [hoitáleimme, hoitášeimme]
    hoitát+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [hoitálii, hoitášii]
    hoitát+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [hoitáš, hoitáža]
    hoitát+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: hoitážit
    hoitát+V+TV+Ger: [hoitádin, hoitádiin, hoitádettiin]
    hoitát+V+TV+PrfPrc: hoitán
    hoitát+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: hoitájuvvot
    hoitát+V+TV+Der/goahti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: hoitágohten
    hoitát+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: hoitástalaiga
    hoitát+V+TV+Der/h+V+Der/easti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: hoitáheasttát
    hoitát+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: hoitámis

  Verb - duippidit: # MUITAL_TV
    duippidit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: duippidan
    duippidit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: duippida
    duippidit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: duippidit
    duippidit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: duippideigga
    duippidit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: duippideiddet
    duippidit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [duippide, duippidedje]
    duippidit+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: duippit
    duippidit+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: duippidehkoset
    duippidit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: duippidivččiimet
    duippidit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: duippidivčče
    duippidit+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [duippideš, duippideažžá]
    duippidit+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: duippidežžet
    duippidit+V+TV+Ger: duippidettiin
    duippidit+V+TV+PrfPrc: duippidan
    duippidit+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: duippiduvvot
    duippidit+V+TV+Der/goahti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: duippidišgohten
    duippidit+V+TV+Der/easti+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: duippidesttiiga
    duippidit+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: [duippideamis, duippideamin]

  Verb - huobastit: # ALIST_IV
    huobastit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huobastan
    huobastit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huobasta
    huobastit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: huobastit
    huobastit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: huobasteigga
    huobastit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: huobasteiddet
    huobastit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [huobaste, huobastedje]
    huobastit+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: huobas
    huobastit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: huobastehkoset
    huobastit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: huobastivččiimet
    huobastit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: huobastivčče
    huobastit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [huobasteš, huobasteažžá]
    huobastit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: huobastežžet
    huobastit+V+IV+Ger: huobastettiin
    huobastit+V+IV+PrfPrc: huobastan
    huobastit+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: huobastuvvot
    huobastit+V+IV+Der/goahti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: huobastišgohten
    huobastit+V+IV+Der/easti+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: huobastesttiiga
    huobastit+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: [huobasteamis,huobasteamin]

  Verb - čohkánit: # LASSAN_IV
    čohkánit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čohkánan
    čohkánit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čohkána
    čohkánit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čohkánit
    čohkánit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: čohkáneigga
    čohkánit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: čohkáneiddet
    čohkánit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [čohkáne, čohkánedje]
    čohkánit+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: čohkán
    čohkánit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: čohkánehkoset
    čohkánit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: čohkánivččiimet
    čohkánit+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: čohkánivčče
    čohkánit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [čohkáneš, čohkáneažžá]
    čohkánit+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: čohkánežžet
    čohkánit+V+IV+Ger: čohkánettiin
    čohkánit+V+IV+PrfPrc: čohkánan
    čohkánit+V+IV+Der/goahti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čohkánišgohten
    čohkánit+V+IV+Der/easti+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: čohkánesttiiga
    čohkánit+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: [čohkáneamis, čohkáneamin]

  Proper - Románia: # ACCRA-plc
    Románia+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Románia
    Románia+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Románia
    Románia+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Romániai
    Románia+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Románias, Románian]
    Románia+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: románialažžii
    Románia+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: románialaččaid
    
  Proper - BackOffice: # RONDANE-obj
    BackOffice+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: BackOffice
    BackOffice+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: BackOffice
    BackOffice+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: BackOfficii
    BackOffice+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [BackOffices, BackOfficen]

  Proper - Kaffegalleriija: # NIKOSIIJA-obj
    Kaffegalleriija+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Kaffegalleriija
    Kaffegalleriija+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Kaffegalleriija
    Kaffegalleriija+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Kaffegalleriijai
    Kaffegalleriija+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Kaffegalleriijas, Kaffegalleriijan]

  Proper - Kerguelensuolu: # DAVVISUOLU-plc
    Kerguelensuolu+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Kerguelensuolu
    Kerguelensuolu+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Kerguelensullo
    Kerguelensuolu+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Kerguelensullui
    Kerguelensuolu+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Kerguelensullos, Kerguelensullon]

  Proper - Klareatnu: # MARJA-U-plc
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Klareatnu
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Klareanu
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Klaretnui
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Klareanus, Klareanun]
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: klareatnulažžii
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: klareatnulaččaid

  Proper - Klemmoaivi: # MARJA-I-plc
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Klemmoaivi
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Klemmoaivvi
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Klemmoaivái
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Klemmoaivvis, Klemmoaivvin]
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: klemmoaivilažžii
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: klemmoaivilaččaid

  Proper - Kruvnnasavu: # GUOLBBA-plc
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Kruvnnasavu
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: [Kruvnnasavvona, Kruvnnasavvon]
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Kruvnnasavvonii
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Kruvnnasavvonis, Kruvnnasavvonin]
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: kruvnnasavulažžii
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: kruvnnasavulaččaid

  Proper - Bergsjø: # NYSTØ
    Bergsjø+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Bergsjø
    Bergsjø+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: [Bergsjø, Bergsjøa]
    Bergsjø+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: [Bergsjøi, Bergsjøii, Bergsjøai]
    Bergsjø+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Bergsjøs, "Bergsjø:s", Bergsjøas, Bergsjøan]

  Proper - Siglufjörđur: # LONDON-plc
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Siglufjörđur
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: [Siglufjörđura, Siglufjörđur]
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Siglufjörđurii
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Siglufjörđuris, Siglufjörđurin]
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: siglufjörđurlažžii
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: siglufjörđurlaččaid

  Proper - Silbabološ: # PLACE-DIM-plc
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Silbabološ
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Silbaboloža
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Silbaboložii
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Silbaboložis, Silbaboložin]
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: silbaboložlažžii
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: silbaboložlaččaid

  Proper - Sottinen: # C-FI-NEN-sur
    Sottinen+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Sottinen
    Sottinen+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: [Sottinena, Sottisa, Sottinen]
    Sottinen+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: [Sottinenii, Sottisii]
    Sottinen+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Sottinenas, Sottisis]

  Proper - Stai: # DUBAI-sur
    Stai+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Stai
    Stai+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: [Staija, Stai]
    Stai+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Staijii
    Stai+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Staijas, Staijan]

  Proper - Kerberos: # BERN-ani
    Kerberos+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Kerberos
    Kerberos+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: [Kerberosa, Kerberos]
    Kerberos+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Kerberosii
    Kerberos+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Kerberosas, Kerberosan]

  Proper - Vállášvuomus: # DUORTNUS-plc
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Vállášvuomus
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: [Vállášvupmosa, Vállášvupmos]
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Vállášvupmosii
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Vállášvupmosis, Vállášvupmosin]
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: vállášvuomuslažžii
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: vállášvuomuslaččaid

  Proper - Ándaras: # ANAR-mal
    Ándaras+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Ándaras
    Ándaras+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: [Ándarasa, Ándaras]
    Ándaras+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Ándarassii
    Ándaras+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Ándarasas, Ándarasan]
